Tennessee statutes. Title 30 Administration of Estates
Part 4

Public Administrators, Guardians, and Trustees

30-1-401. Appointment — Term — Oath — Bond.

The county legislative body has the power to appoint or elect a public administrator, a public guardian and a public trustee, who shall hold office for four (4) years, and who, before entering upon their duties of the office, shall take the oath by law prescribed for administrators, guardians and trustees, and shall give bond, with good and approved sureties, in such amount as may be necessary and amply sufficient, in the discretion of the county legislative body, to protect the estates, funds, and property that may come into their hands, which bond as to amount may be increased, from time to time, by the county legislative body.

Acts 1870, ch. 98, § 1; Shan., § 583; mod. Code 1932, § 837; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1501; Acts 1987, ch. 322, § 1.

Cross-References. Jurisdiction of chancery courts of probate and related matters, title 16, chapter 16, part 2.

Public guardianship for the elderly, title 34, ch. 7.

Renewal of bond, § 30-1-408.

30-1-402. Applicable laws, rules, duties and penalties.

Administrators, guardians and trustees shall, in all things, be governed by, and be subject to, all the laws, rules, duties, and penalties, prescribed by law for the government of other administrators and guardians, and the management and settlement of estates and trusts.

Acts 1870, ch. 98, § 2; Shan., § 584; Code 1932, § 838; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1502; Acts 1987, ch. 322, § 2.

Cross-References. Accounts and settlement of estates, title 30, ch. 2, part 6.

Distribution of estates, title 30, ch. 2, part 7.

Guardianship, title 34.

Inventory and management of estates, title 30, ch. 2, part 3.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 558.

30-1-403. Death or removal — Filling vacancy.

On the death, removal, or resignation of an administrator, guardian or trustee provided for in this part, the county legislative body may fill the vacancy for the unexpired term.

Acts 1870, ch. 98, § 3; Shan., § 585; Code 1932, § 839; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1503; Acts 1987, ch. 322, § 3.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 556.

30-1-404. Duty to enter upon administration, guardianship, or trusteeship of estates.

Should any person entitled to the administration of an estate, or to the guardianship of any minor, or person found to be incompetent, fail or neglect to apply to the probate court having jurisdiction, and take out letters of administration and guardianship, within six (6) months after the death of the intestate, or within three (3) months after the settlement of the estate by the administrator, it shall be the duty of the administrator or guardian, provided for in this part immediately to enter upon the administration or guardianship of the estates, as the case may be, first applying to the probate court, for the necessary letters of administration or guardianship.

Should any person entitled to serve as trustee under an inter vivos or testamentary instrument die, decline to serve or resign and if:

There is no individual or corporate successor or substitute trustee designated by the instrument who is willing and qualified to serve;

The instrument does not contain provisions for the appointment of a successor or substitute and no adult income beneficiary or vested remainderman petitions for the appointment of a successor or substitute trustee within three (3) months after there is a vacancy in office or all sooner waive this right; or

The court in its discretion in a proceeding pursuant to § 35-15-414 determines that a small trust should not be terminated but a successor trustee should be appointed;

the court may appoint the public trustee who shall be granted letters of trusteeship and immediately enter into the administration of the trust, provided that the then market value of the trust estate does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). The public trustee shall file accountings with the court each twelve (12) months after the public trustee's qualification.

Acts 1870, ch. 98, § 4; 1870-1871, ch. 114; 1883, ch. 108, § 1; Shan., § 586; Code 1932, § 840; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1504; Acts 1987, ch. 322, § 4; 2009, ch. 477, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 35-1-113, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 97.

Cross-References. Appointment of administrator by chancery court, title 30, ch. 1, part 3.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 553, 557.

30-1-405. Letters of administration — When granted.

The letters of administration may be granted, at any time within six (6) months after the death of the intestate, when it appears that the persons entitled to letters of administration refuse, after legal notice, to administer, and if it further appears that the interest of the estate requires that letters of administration should be granted.

Acts 1883, ch. 108, § 1; Shan., § 587; Code 1932, § 841; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1505.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 557.

30-1-406. Notice given persons entitled to serve — Effect of nonappearance.

The notice served on those entitled to administer shall fix a day on which they may appear and qualify, and their failure shall be sufficient evidence of their refusal, and the day so fixed shall not be less than two (2) months after the death of the intestate.

Acts 1883, ch. 108, § 1; Shan., § 588; Code 1932, § 842; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1506.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 557.

30-1-407. Compensation for services.

The administrator, guardian or trustee shall have all the powers, and shall receive the same compensation, that other administrators, guardians and trustees are entitled to receive for their services, and this compensation shall be approved by the court at the time of periodic accountings or in the order appointing the administrator, guardian, or trustee.

Acts 1870, ch. 98, § 5; Shan., § 589; Code 1932, § 843; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1507; Acts 1987, ch. 322, § 5.

Cross-References. Compensation of executors, administrators or accounting party, § 30-2-606.

30-1-408. Renewal of bond.

The county legislative body shall have the power, on the death, removal, or insolvency of any one (1) or more of the sureties on the bond of the administrator, guardian or trustee, to require the administrator, guardian or trustee to renew that person's bond, or give other good and sufficient security for the performance of that person's duties, and to take any and all steps that may be necessary to secure the estates committed to the charge of the administrator, guardian or trustee.

Acts 1870, ch. 98, § 6; Shan., § 590; Code 1932, § 844; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1508; Acts 1987, ch. 322, § 6.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 556.

30-1-150. Title definitions.